Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 61.
Contracts; suits on contracts; partnership with husband.

A married woman may make contracts with any person other than her husband and bind herself and her separate property in the same manner as if she were unmarried.
She may sue and be sued as to all such contracts made by her, either before or during coverture, without her husband being joined in the action as plaintiff or defendant, and execution may issue against her and be levied on her sole and separate goods, chattels and estate.
Irrespective of the provisions herein, a married woman may enter into a contract of general or limited business partnership in which partnership her husband is also a partner, may contract with him for such purpose and may be a partner with him.

Partnership with husband.

Under this section husband and wife may jointly contract and be jointly sued as partners. Lane v. Bishop & Co., 65 Vt. 575, 27 A. 499, 1893 Vt. LEXIS 96 (1893).

§ 62.
Woman marrying pending action to which she is party.

If an unmarried woman, who is party to an action, marries during the pendency thereof, such civil marriage may be suggested upon the record.
Such action shall not abate by reason of the marriage, but shall proceed to final judgment, decree, or execution in the same manner as if she had remained unmarried.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 63.
Executrix, administratrix, guardian, or trustee.

A married woman may be appointed executrix, administratrix, guardian, or trustee, and the marriage of a single woman shall not affect her authority to so act under a previous appointment.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 64.
Sole deed.

A married woman may convey or mortgage by her sole deed the real estate of which she is seized in her own right to her sole and separate use as she might do by her separate deed if unmarried.
She may by her sole deed convey or mortgage and manage and control any other real estate acquired by her on or after February 13, 1919, except that a homestead interest therein and the real estate of which she is seized jointly with her husband may be conveyed or mortgaged only by the joint deed of herself and husband.

§ 65.
Name on deed.

When a conveyance of real estate is made by a married woman and such real estate was acquired by her under a name other than her present married name, such conveyance shall set forth both her present married name and the name under which such real estate was acquired.
Such conveyance shall be indexed by a town or county clerk receiving the same for record under both her present married name and the name under which such real estate was acquired.
However, a deed which fails to describe the grantor, as aforesaid, shall not impair the grantee’s title conveyed by such deed.

§ 66.
Rights in personalty.

All personal property and rights of action acquired by a woman before or during coverture, except by gift from her husband, shall be held to her sole and separate use.
Neither a wife’s separate property nor the rents, issues, income and products of the same shall be subject to the disposal of her husband or liable for his debts.
Nothing herein contained shall authorize a claim by either husband or wife against the other for personal services.

§ 67.
Estates by entirety.

Real estate and tangible personal property and the products thereof, held and owned by husband and wife by the entirety, are made chargeable during the lifetime of the husband for the debts contracted by him for the necessary upkeep of such property, in the same manner and to the same extent as if owned and held by him in his sole name.

§ 68.
Income and monies from sale of real estate.

The rents, issues, and products of the real estate of a married woman, and monies and obligations arising from the sale of such real estate, and the interest of her husband in her right in real estate that belonged to her before marriage, or that she acquires by gift, grant, devise, or inheritance during coverture, shall be exempt during coverture from attachment or levy of execution for the sole debts of her husband.
However, such annual products may be attached or levied upon for a debt or liability of her husband for the necessaries for the wife and family of such husband, and for debts for labor or materials furnished upon or for the cultivation or improvement of such real estate.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 69.
Liability for debts or torts of spouse.

A married person shall not be liable for a debt contracted by his or her spouse before marriage, nor for the torts of his or her spouse unless committed by the person’s authority or direction.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.